Utah statutes.
10-3-706.   Revision of ordinances.

The governing body by resolution may authorize and direct the mayor to appoint, with the advice and consent of the governing body, one or more persons to prepare and submit to the governing body a compilation, revision or codification of municipal ordinances. The compensation for the service shall be fixed by resolution of the governing body and paid out of the municipal treasury.

